Utah statutes.
76-5-205.   Manslaughter.

(1)  Criminal homicide constitutes manslaughter if the actor:

(a)  recklessly causes the death of another;

(b)  commits a homicide which would be murder, but the offense is reduced pursuant to Subsection 76-5-203(4); or

(c)  commits murder, but special mitigation is established under Section 76-5-205.5.

(2)  Manslaughter is a felony of the second degree.

(3) (a)  In addition to the penalty provided under this section or any other section, a person who is convicted of violating this section shall have the person's driver license revoked under Section 53-3-220 if the death of another person results from driving a motor vehicle.

(b)  The court shall forward the report of the conviction resulting from driving a motor vehicle to the Driver License Division in accordance with Section 53-3-218.



Amended by Chapter 157, 2010 General Session

